Utah statutes.
63L-1-205.   Concurrent jurisdiction over certain minor violations at Dugway Proving Ground.

The state of Utah hereby cedes to the United States, retaining also the same to itself, concurrent jurisdiction over class B and C misdemeanors and traffic violations no more serious than a class B misdemeanor within the following described boundaries in the Counties of Tooele and Juab, State of Utah, in the Salt Lake Meridian:

BEGINNING at the NE corner of Section 1, T8S, R9W;

1.  Thence, South along the Range line between R8W and R9W, 9 miles and 2.57 chains to the SE corner of Section 13, T9S, R9W;

2.  Thence, West, along the South line of Sections 13, 14, 15 and 16, T9S, R9W, 4 miles to the NE corner of Section 20, T9S, R9W;

3.  Thence, South, along the East line of said Section 20 to the SE corner of said Section 20;

4.  Thence, Southwesterly in a straight line to the Southwest corner of Section 31, T10S, R10W;

5.  Thence, continuing Southwesterly along said line to a point in Section 1, T11S, R11W, said point bears 0.7 mile along said Southwesterly line from the SW corner of said Section 31;

6.  Thence, Northwesterly, in a straight line from said point, to the SW corner of Section 34, T9S, R11W;

7.  Thence, North along the West line of said Section 34 to the NW corner of said Section 34;

8.  Thence, West along the South line of Sections 28 and 29, T9S, R11W, to the SE corner of Section 30, T9S, R11W;

9.  Thence, Northwest in a straight line to the NE corner of Section 23, T9S, R12W;

10.  Thence, West along the North line of Sections 23, 22, and projected Sections 21, 20 and 19 to the Range line between R12W and R13W;

11.  Thence, South along said Range line to the South line of T10S;

12.  Thence, West along last said Township line to the Range line common to R16W and R17W;

13.  Thence, North along last said Range line to the West quarter corner of Section 6, T10S, R16W;

14.  Thence, East along the East-West centerline of said Section 6 to the North-South centerline of said Section 6;

15.  Thence, North along said North-South centerline to the North quarter corner of said Section 6;

16.  Thence, East along the North line of said Section 6 to the NE corner of said Section 6;

17.  Thence, North along the East line of Section 31, T9S, R16W, to the NE corner of the SE 1/4 SE 1/4 of said Section 31;

18.  Thence, West along the North line of the S 1/2 S 1/2 of last said Section 31, T9S, R16W, to the West line of said Section 31;

19.  Thence, North along said West line to the East-West line of last said Section 31;

20.  Thence, East along said East-West line to the SE corner of the SW 1/4 NW 1/4 of last said Section 31;

21.  Thence, North along the East line of said SW 1/4 NW 1/4 to the NE corner of SW 1/4 NW 1/4 of last said Section 31;

22.  Thence, West along the North line of said SW 1/4 NW 1/4 to the NW corner of said SW 1/4 NW 1/4 of last said Section 31, said corner also being on the Range line common to R16W and R17W;

23.  Thence, North along last said Range line to the NW corner of Section 6, T6S, R16W;

24.  Thence, East along the North line of T6S to the NE corner of Section 1, T6S, R13W;

25.  Thence, North along the West line of R13W to the NW corner of Section 6, T6S, R12W;

26.  Thence, East along the North line of T6S to the NE corner of Section 1, T6S, R12W;

27.  Thence, North along the Range line between R11W and R12W, 5 miles and 37.68 chains to the closing corner of T5S, R11W and T5S, R12W, said corner bears East 10.97 chains from the standard corner of T4S, R11W and T4S, R12W;

28.  Thence, East along the Township line common to T4S and T5S, 6 miles and 74.49 chains to the divide crest of the Cedar Mountain Range;

29.  Thence, Southeasterly, along or near the crest of the Cedar Mountain Range through T5S, R10W, T6S, R10W, and T6S, R9W, the following courses:

30.  Thence, S 1° 29' W, 69.63 chains;

31.  Thence, S 4° 18' E, 94.83 chains;

32.  Thence, S 5° 21' E, 87.44 chains;

33.  Thence, S 63° 27' E, 26.60 chains;

34.  Thence, S 17° 15' E, 70.51 chains;

35.  Thence, S 55° 37' E, 132.09 chains;

36.  Thence, S 56° 22' E, 108.71 chains;

37.  Thence, S 24° 31' E, 20.92 chains; to a point which bears West, 125.29 chains from the SW corner of T5S, R9W;

38.  Thence, S 28° 06' E, 70.05 chains;

39.  Thence, S 69° 15' E, 26.73 chains;

40.  Thence, S 41° 32' E, 55.35 chains;

41.  Thence, N 89° 19' E, 30.79 chains;

42.  Thence, S 25° 40' E, 36.19 chains;

43.  Thence, N 66° 24' E, 56.38 chains;

44.  Thence, S 63° 17' E, 76.05 chains;

45.  Thence, S 38° 48' E, 29.84 chains;

46.  Thence, S 82° 20' E, 71.44 chains;

47.  Thence, S 35° 07' E, 32.82 chains;

48.  Thence, S 36° 24' W, 18.77 chains;

49.  Thence, S 01° 41' W, 61.73 chains;

50.  Thence, N 65° 19' E, 25.68 chains;

51.  Thence, S 52° 59' E, 41.19 chains;

52.  Thence, N 85° 57' E, 44.22 chains;

53.  Thence, S 58° 52' E, 69.09 chains;

54.  Thence, S 82° 14' E, 46.21 chains;

55.  Thence, S 26° 06' E, 74.82 chains;

56.  Thence, S 88° 42' E, 14.59 chains to a point on the Range line common to R8W and R9W, said point bears South 12.78 chains from the NW corner of Section 31, T6S, R8W;

57.  Thence, leaving the Cedar Mountain Crest, South along said Range line common to R8W and R9W, 68.85 chains to the SW corner of T6S, R8W;

58.  Thence, East along the Township line between Ts. 6 and 7 S., 4 miles, 9.5 chains, to the closing corner of Sections 2 and 3, T7S, R8W;

59.  Thence, South, along Section line, 3 miles, 73.37 chains, to the corner of Sections 22, 23, 26 and 27, T7S, R8W;

60.  Thence, West, along Section lines, 4 miles 0.45 chains, to the closing  corner of Sections 19 and 30, on the West boundary of T7S, R8W;

61.  Thence, South, along the Range lines between Rs. 8 and 9 W, 1 mile 37.14 chains to the Northeast corner of T8S, R9W, and the POINT OF BEGINNING.

TOGETHER with all that land in Section 36, T10S, R11W lying Southwesterly of the line described in Course No. 6 of this description.

EXCEPTING THEREFROM: NW 1/4 of Section 9, T8S, R13W; and the NE 1/4 SW 1/4 of Section 30, T10S, R16W.

The operative provisions of this section also apply to the property within the following described boundaries:

Township 6 South, Range 4 West, Salt Lake Meridian, Section 4, S 1/2; Section 5, Lots 3 and 4, S 1/2 NW 1/4 and S 1/2; Sections 6 to 9, inclusive; Section 15, W 1/2; Sections 16 to 21, inclusive; Section 22, W 1/2; Section 27, W 1/2; Sections 28 to 30.

Township 6 South, Range 5 West, Salt Lake Meridian, Sections 1 to 3, inclusive; Sections 11 to 14, inclusive; Sections 23 to 26, inclusive; those portions of Sections 4, 9, 10, 15, 22, and 27 lying East of the Union Pacific Railroad Right-of-Way, and situated within the boundary of the Deseret Chemical Depot (formerly St. John Ordnance Depot) County of Tooele, State of Utah, which lands were withdrawn from all forms of appropriation under the public land laws, including the mining and mineral leasing laws and reserved for use by the Department of Army (formerly War Department) as an Ordnance Storage Depot by the Public Land Order No. 15 dated July 21, 1942, and Public Land Order No. 66 dated November 30, 1942; and which are within the Rush Valley Unit of the Bonneville Grazing District No. 2, Utah.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

